Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,111
Commission; members; terms.

(1) The appointed members of the commission shall serve for terms of six years, except that, of the members first appointed:

(a) The Governor shall designate (i) one individual from a list submitted by the Legislature to serve a term of one year; (ii) the individual appointed at large to serve a term of three years; (iii) one individual from a list submitted by the Legislature to serve a term of five years; and (iv) an additional individual appointed at large to serve a term of six years; and

(b) The Secretary of State shall designate (i) the individual from the list submitted by the Democrat state chairperson to serve a term of two years; (ii) the individual appointed at large to serve a term of four years; (iii) the individual from the list submitted by the Republican state chairperson to serve a term of six years; and (iv) the additional individual appointed at large to serve a term of six years.

(2) All succeeding appointments to the commission shall be made in the same manner as the original appointments are made and succeeding appointees shall have the same qualifications as their predecessors. Each such appointment shall be made in such a manner so that by succeeding appointments the appointed membership of the commission consists of not more than three members from any one congressional district.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 111;

Laws 1979, LB 54, § 5.